Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.360

Educational and career opportunities in the military, student access to information on, when.

If a public institution of higher education provides access to the campus and the student information directory to persons or groups which make students aware of occupational or educational options, the institution of higher education shall provide access on the same basis to official recruiting representatives of the military forces of the state and the United States for the purpose of informing students of educational and career opportunities available in the military.

[ 1980 c 96 s 2.]